Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 15
CARE OF BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS

Sec.

§ 39-1501. Vaccines, antitoxins and other sera — Storage pending sale — Date of sale.

It shall be the duty of any person, persons, firm, corporation, or other person, having for sale any biological products such as smallpox vaccine, diphtheria antitoxin, typhoid vaccine, antirabic vaccine, or any other sera used in the prevention or treatment of human ills, and which deteriorates with age, or when exposed to heat or light, or freezing, to keep same stored in a proper container where the temperature shall be equalized at not more than sixty degrees F., nor less than fifty degrees F., and not exposed to the light: providing, further, that no such products as mentioned in this chapter shall be offered for sale or dispensed in any manner unless they are well within the date stamped on said package.

§ 39-1502. Jurisdiction of director.

It shall be the duty of the director of the department of health and welfare to see that this chapter is complied with.

§ 39-1503. Penalty for violation.

Upon conviction of failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter, said person, persons, firm or corporation shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.